Utah statutes.
70A-2-719.   Contractual modification or limitation of remedy.

(1)  Subject to the provisions of Subsections (2) and (3) of this section and
of the preceding section on liquidation and limitation of damages,
(a)  the agreement may provide for remedies in addition to or in substitution
for those provided in this chapter and may limit or alter the measure of
damages recoverable under this chapter, as by limiting the buyer's remedies to
return of the goods and repayment of the price or to repair and replacement of
nonconforming goods or parts; and
(b)  resort to a remedy as provided is optional unless the remedy is expressly
agreed to be exclusive, in which case it is the sole remedy.
(2)  Where circumstances cause an exclusive or limited remedy to fail of its
essential purpose, remedy may be had as provided in this act.
(3)  Consequential damages may be limited or excluded unless the limitation or
exclusion is unconscionable. Limitation of consequential damages for injury to
the person in the case of consumer goods is prima facie unconscionable but
limitation of damages where the loss is commercial is not.
